Utah statutes.
53-1-204.   Division duties.

The division shall:

(1)  provide administrative and staff support to the commissioner;

(2)  ensure that all departmental administrative processes are in compliance with state law, rules, and procedures;

(3)  administer all human resource related matters throughout the department;

(4)  make deposits, pay all claims and obligations of the department, and conduct all treasury transactions;

(5)  prepare the department budget, review department expenditures, prepare financial reports, and offer general assistance with financial matters to the department;

(6)  coordinate and review department purchases and monitor department purchasing practices to ensure compliance with state procurement rules;

(7)  coordinate the purchase, operation, maintenance, records, and final disposal of the department's vehicle fleet;

(8)  make capital facility plans for the department, maintain a capital equipment inventory system, coordinate risk management records, and organize waste paper recycling; and

(9)  make rules for the department authorized by this title.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

